California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 tax imposed by this subparagraph shall be treated as an excise tax with respect to which the deficiency procedures of such subtitle apply” contained therein.

(D) Section 851(i)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to imposition of tax on failures, shall not apply.

(b) “Investment company income” means investment company taxable income, as defined in Section 852(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, modified as follows:

(1) Section 852(b)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to an exclusion for net capital gain, does not apply.

(2) Section 852(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating losses, is modified to deny the deduction allowed under Sections 24416 and 24416.1, in lieu of denying the deduction allowed by Section
 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) In lieu of the provision of Section 852(b)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special deductions for corporations, no deduction shall be allowed under Sections 24402, 24406, 24410, and 25106.

(4) The deduction for dividends paid, under Section 852(b)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, is modified to allow capital gain dividends and exempt interest dividends (to the extent that interest is included in gross income under this part) to be included in the computation of the deduction.

(c) Section 852(b)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to imposition of tax, shall not apply.

(d) (1) Section 852(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exempt-interest dividends, is
 modified by substituting the phrase “that, when held by an individual, the interest therefrom is exempt from taxation by this state” for the phrase “described in section 103(a)” contained therein.

(2) Section 852(b)(5)(A)(iv)(V) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exempt interest, is modified by substituting the phrase “on obligations that, if held by an individual, is exempt from taxation by this state, over the amounts disallowed as deductions under subdivision (b) of Section 24360 or Section 24425” for the phrase “excludable from gross income under section 103(a) over the amounts disallowed as deductions under sections 265 and 171(a)(2)” contained therein.

(3) Section 852(b)(5)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of exempt-interest dividends by shareholders, shall not apply.

(e) Section
 854 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitations applicable to dividends received from regulated investment companies, is modified to refer to Sections 24402, 24406, 24410, and 25106, in lieu of Section 243 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) Section 852(g)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “subdivision (a) of Section 17145” for the phrase “the first sentence of subsection (b)(5)” contained therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 38.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

24872.

(a) A real estate investment trust shall be deemed to have satisfied the distribution requirements of Section 857(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of this part if it satisfies the distribution requirements of Section 857(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal purposes.

(b) (1) Section 857(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to imposition of tax on real estate investment trusts, shall not apply.

(2) Every real estate investment trust shall be subject to the taxes imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), except that its “net income” shall be equal to its “real estate investment trust income,” as defined in subdivision (c).

(c) “Real estate investment trust income” means real estate investment company taxable income, as defined in Section 857(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, modified as follows:

(1) In lieu of Section 857(b)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special deductions for corporations, no deduction shall be allowed under Section 24402.

(2) Section 857(b)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to an exclusion for an amount equal to the net income from
 foreclosure property, shall not apply.

(3) Section 857(b)(2)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to a deduction for an amount equal to the tax imposed in the case of failure to meet certain requirements for the taxable year, shall not apply.

(4) Section 857(b)(2)(F) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to an exclusion for an amount equal to any net income derived from prohibited transactions, shall not apply.

(d) Section 857(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to an alternative tax in case of capital gains, shall not apply.

(e) Section 857(b)(4)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the imposition of tax on income from foreclosure property, shall not apply.

(f) Section 857(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the imposition of tax in case of failure to meet certain requirements, shall not apply.

(g) Section 857(b)(6)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the imposition of tax on income from prohibited transactions, shall not apply.

(h) Section 857(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to income from redetermined rents, redetermined deductions, and excess interest, shall not apply.

(i) Section 857(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to restrictions applicable to dividends received from real estate investment trusts, is modified to refer to Sections 24402, 24406, 24410, and 25106, in lieu of Section 243 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(j) The amendments to this
 section by Chapter 878 of the Statutes of 1993 are clarifications of legislative intent and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 73.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

24872.4.

(a) Section 856(d)(7)(C)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “if received by an organization described in subdivision (b) of Section 17651 of Part 10 or Section 23731” for the phrase “if received by an organization described in section 511(a)(2).”

(b) (1) An election under Section 856(e)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal income tax purposes is treated for purposes of this part as an election made by the
 real estate investment trust under Section 856(e)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5 is not allowed.

(2) Any revocation of an election under Section 856(e)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal income tax purposes is treated for purposes of this part as a revocation of the election made by the real estate investment trust under Section 856(e)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5 is not allowed with respect to the property for any subsequent taxable year.

(3) If the real estate investment trust fails to make an election under Section 856(e)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal income tax purposes with respect to any property, that property may not be treated for purposes of this
 part as foreclosure property, an election under Section 856(e)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes with respect to that property is not allowed, and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5 is not allowed with respect to that property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

24872.6.

(a) A corporation, trust, or association that is a real estate investment trust for any taxable year for federal purposes under Part II (commencing with Section 856) of Subchapter M of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code (as applicable for federal purposes for the taxable year) shall be a real estate investment trust for purposes of this part for the same taxable year.

(b) A corporation, trust, or association that is not a real estate investment trust for any taxable year for federal purposes under Part II (commencing with Section 856) of Subchapter M of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code (as applicable for federal purposes for the taxable year) shall not be a real estate investment trust for purposes of this part for the same taxable year.

(c) (1) An election to be a real estate investment trust for federal purposes under Section 856(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as applicable for federal purposes for the taxable year) shall be treated, for purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and this part, as an election to be a real estate investment trust for state purposes for the same taxable year and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (e) of Section 23051.5 shall not be allowed.

(2) (A) The termination or revocation of an election described in paragraph (1) for federal purposes under Section 856(g) of the Internal Revenue Code (as applicable for federal purposes for the taxable year) shall be treated, for purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and this part, as a termination or revocation, as the case may be, of an election described in paragraph (1) for state purposes and a separate termination or revocation of an election described in paragraph (1) under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5 shall not be allowed.

(B) Section 856(g)(5)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), this subdivision shall apply to any election to be a real estate investment trust that is effective for federal purposes for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2001.

(B) Subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 176, Sec. 4.   (AB 1719)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

24872.7.

(a) (1) (A) Whenever a penalty is imposed for federal purposes under Section 857(f)(2)(A) or (B) of the Internal Revenue Code, whichever is applicable, it shall be deemed that the real estate investment trust has failed to comply with the requirements of Section 857(f)(2)(A) or (B) of the Internal Revenue Code, whichever is applicable, for state purposes for that taxable year and a penalty equal to the penalty determined for federal purposes under Section 857(f)(2)(A) or (B) of the Internal
 Revenue Code, whichever is applicable, shall be imposed and shall be paid on notice and demand and in the same manner as tax.

(B) No penalty shall be imposed under this paragraph if the Secretary of the Treasury, under Section 857(f)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, has determined that the failure to comply is due to reasonable cause and not to willful neglect.

(2) (A) Whenever a penalty is imposed for federal purposes under Section 857(f)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code it shall be deemed that the real estate investment trust has failed to comply with the requirements of Section 857(f)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes for that taxable year and an additional penalty equal to the penalty determined for federal purposes under Section 857(f)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be imposed and shall be paid on notice and demand and
 in the same manner as tax.

(B) No penalty shall be imposed under this paragraph if the Secretary of the Treasury, under Section 857(f)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, has determined that the failure to comply is due to reasonable cause and not to willful neglect.

(b) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning after August 5, 1997.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 198.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24873.

Section 860F(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the 100 percent tax on prohibited transactions, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 698, Sec. 26.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

24874.

A real estate mortgage investment conduit (REMIC) shall be subject to the minimum franchise tax imposed under Section 23153.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 698, Sec. 26.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

24875.

(a) A financial asset securitization investment trust (FASIT) shall be subject to the minimum franchise tax imposed under Section 23153.

(b) For purposes of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 19001) the taxes imposed by this section shall be treated as taxes to which the deficiency procedures of that article
 apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 286.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24876.

(a) The amendments made to Section 860E(a)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 2303(a)(2)(C) of Public Law 116-136, relating to conforming amendments, shall not apply. 

(b) The amendments made to Section 860E(a)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 10101(a)(4)(B)(ii) of Public Law 117-169, relating to conforming adjustments, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 116.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Gain or Loss on Disposition of Property [24901. - 24998.]



  ARTICLE 1. Computation of Gain or Loss [24901. - 24905.5.]

24901.

(a) The gain from the sale or other disposition of property shall be the excess of the amount realized therefrom over the adjusted basis provided in Section 24911 for determining gain, and the loss shall be the excess of the adjusted basis provided in that section for determining loss over the amount realized.

(b) The amount realized from the sale or other disposition of property shall be the sum of any money received plus the fair market value of the property (other than
 money) received. In determining the amount realized—

(1) There shall not be taken into account any amount received as reimbursement for real property taxes which are treated under Section 24346 as imposed on the purchaser, and

(2) There shall be taken into account amounts representing real property taxes which are treated under Section 24346 as imposed on the corporation if those taxes are to be paid by the purchaser.

(c) In the case of a sale or exchange of property, the extent to which the gain or loss determined under this section shall be recognized for purposes of this part shall be determined under Section 24902.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent (in the case of property sold under contract providing for payment in
 installments) the taxation of that portion of any installment payment representing gain or profit in the year in which that payment is received.

(e) (1) In determining gain or loss from the sale or other disposition of a term interest in property, that portion of the adjusted basis of that interest which is determined pursuant to Sections 24914 and 24915 (to the extent that the adjusted basis is a portion of the entire adjusted basis of the property) shall be disregarded.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the term “term interest in property” means—

(A) A life interest in property,

(B) An interest in property for a term of years, or

(C) An income interest in a
 trust.

(3) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to a sale or other disposition which is a part of a transaction in which the entire interest in property is transferred to any person or persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24902.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, on the sale or exchange of property the entire amount of the gain or loss, determined under Section 24901, shall be recognized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24905.

(a) Section 988 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of certain foreign currency transactions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 988(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to source, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 79.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24905.5.

For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, the amendments made to Section 988 of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 13223 of the Revenue Reconciliation Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-66), relating to mark to market accounting method for securities dealers, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 199.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Basis for Computation of Gain or Loss [24911. - 24919.]

24911.

(a) The adjusted basis for determining the gain or loss from the sale or other disposition of property, whenever acquired, shall be the basis (determined under Section 24912) or other applicable sections of Chapter 15 (relating to gain or loss on disposition of property) and Chapter 8 (relating to corporate distributions and adjustments), adjusted as provided in Sections 24916 and 24917. 

(b) If a deduction is allowable under Section 24357 (relating to charitable contributions) by reason of a sale, then the adjusted basis for determining the gain from such sale shall be that portion
 of the adjusted basis which bears the same ratio to the adjusted basis as the amount realized bears to the fair market value of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

24912.

The basis of property shall be the cost of the property, except as otherwise provided in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 24451), relating to corporate distributions and adjustments, and this chapter. The cost of real property shall not include any amount in respect of real property taxes which are treated under Section 24346 as imposed on a corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24913.

If the property should have been included in the last inventory, the basis shall be the last inventory value thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24914.

(a) If the property was acquired by gift after December 31, 1920, the basis shall be the same as it would be in the hands of the donor or the last preceding owner by whom it was not acquired by gift, except that if such basis (adjusted for the period before the date of the gift as provided in Sections 24916 and 24917) is greater than the fair market value of the property at the time of the gift, then for the purpose of determining loss the basis shall be such fair market value. If the facts necessary to determine the basis in the hands of the donor or the last preceding owner are unknown to the donee, the Franchise Tax Board shall, if possible,
 obtain such facts from such donor or last preceding owner, or any other person cognizant thereof. If the Franchise Tax Board finds it impossible to obtain such facts, the basis in the hands of such donor or last preceding owner shall be the fair market value of such property as found by the Franchise Tax Board as of the date or approximate date at which, according to the best information that the Franchise Tax Board is able to obtain, such property was acquired by such donor or last preceding owner.

(b) If the property was acquired after December 31, 1920, by a transfer in trust (other than by a transfer in trust by a gift, bequest, or devise), the basis shall be the same as it would be in the hands of the grantor increased in the amount of gain or decreased in the amount of loss recognized to the grantor on such transfer under the law applicable to the year in which the transfer was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24915.

(a) If—

(1) The property is acquired by gift on or after the date of the enactment of this section, the basis shall be the basis determined under Section 24914, increased (but not above the fair market value of the property at the time of the gift) by the amount of federal gift tax paid with respect to such gift, or

(2) The property was acquired by gift before the date of the enactment of this section and has not been sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed of before such date, the basis of the property shall be increased
 on such date by the amount of federal gift tax paid with respect to such gift, but such increase shall not exceed an amount equal to the amount by which the fair market value of the property at the time of the gift exceeded the basis of the property in the hands of the donor at the time of the gift.

(b) For purposes of subsection (a), the amount of federal gift tax paid with respect to any gift is an amount which bears the same ratio to the amount of gift tax paid under Chapter 12 of Subtitle B of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 with respect to all gifts made by the donor for the calendar year in which such gift is made as the amount of such gift bears to the taxable gifts (as defined in Section 2503(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 but computed without the deduction allowed by Section 2521 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954) made by the donor during such calendar year. For purposes of the preceding sentence, the amount of any gift
 shall be the amount included with respect to such gift in determining (for the purposes of Section 2503(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954) the total amount of gifts made during the calendar year, reduced by the amount of any deduction allowed with respect to such gift under Section 2522 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (relating to charitable deduction) or under Section 2523 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (relating to marital deduction).

(c) For purposes of subsection (a), where the donor and his spouse elected, under Section 2513 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 to have the gift considered as made one-half by each, the amount of gift tax paid with respect to such gift under Chapter 12 of Subtitle B of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 shall be the sum of the amounts of tax paid with respect to each half of such gift (computed in the manner provided in subsection (b)).

(d) For purposes of Section 24917, an increase in basis under subsection (a) shall be treated as an adjustment under Section 24916.

(e) With respect to any property acquired by gift before 1955, references in this section to any provision of this part shall be deemed to refer to the corresponding provision of the Federal Internal Revenue Code of 1939 or prior revenue laws which was effective for the year in which such gift was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 846.)
-------------------------------------------

24916.

Proper adjustment with regard to the property shall in all cases be made as follows:

(a) For expenditures, receipts, losses, or other items properly chargeable to capital account. However, no adjustment shall be made for any of the following:

(1) Sales or use tax paid or incurred in connection with the acquisition of property for which a tax credit is claimed pursuant to Section 23612.2.

(2) Taxes or other carrying charges described in Section 24426, or for expenditures described in Sections 24364 and 24369 for which deductions have been taken in determining net income for the taxable year or any prior taxable year.

(b) For exhaustion, wear and tear, obsolescence, amortization, and depletion:

(1) In the case of corporations subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101), to the extent sustained prior to January 1, 1928, and to the extent allowed (but not less than the amount allowable) under this part, except that no deduction shall be made for amounts in excess of the amount which would have been allowable had depreciation not been computed on the basis of January 1, 1928, value and amounts in excess of the adjustments required by Section 113(b)(1)(B) of the Federal Revenue Act
 of 1938 for depletion prior to January 1, 1932.

(2) In the case of a taxpayer subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), to the extent sustained prior to January 1, 1937, and for periods thereafter to the extent allowed (but not less than the amount allowable) under the provisions of this part.

(3) If a taxpayer has not claimed an amortization deduction for an emergency facility, the adjustment under paragraph (1) shall be made only to the extent ordinarily provided under Sections 24349 and 24372.

(c) In the case of stock (to the extent not provided for in the foregoing subdivisions) for the amount of distributions previously made which, under the law applicable to the year in which the distribution was made, either were tax free or were applicable in reduction of basis (not including
 distributions made by a corporation, which was classified as a personal service corporation under the provisions of the Federal Revenue Act of 1918 or 1921, out of its earnings or profits which were taxable in accordance with the provisions of Section 218 of the Federal Revenue Act of 1918 or 1921).

(d) (1) In the case of corporations subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101), in the case of any bond, as defined in Section 24363, to the extent of the deductions allowable pursuant to Section 24360 with respect thereto.

(2) In the case of taxpayers subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), in the case of any bond, as defined in Section 24363, the interest on which is wholly exempt from the tax imposed by this part, to the extent of the amortizable bond premium disallowable as a deduction pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 24360, and in the case of any other bond, as defined in Section 24363, to the extent of the deductions allowable pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 24360 (or the amount applied to reduce interest payments under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24363.5) with respect thereto.

(3) In the case of property pledged to the Commodity Credit Corporation, to the extent of the amount received as a loan from the Commodity Credit Corporation and treated by the taxpayer as income for the year in which received pursuant to Section 24273, and to the extent of any deficiency on that loan with respect to which the taxpayer has been relieved from liability.

(e) For amounts allowed as deductions as deferred expenses under Section 616(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain expenditures in the development of mines, and resulting in a reduction of
 the taxpayer’s tax, but not less than the amounts allowable under that section for the taxable year and prior years.

(f) For amounts allowable as deductions as deferred expenses under Section 617(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain exploration expenditures, and resulting in a reduction of the taxpayer’s tax, but not less than the amounts allowable under that section for the taxable year and prior years.

(g) For amounts allowed as deductions as deferred expenses under subdivision (a) of Section 24366, relating to research and experimental expenditures, and resulting in a reduction of the corporation’s taxes under this part, but not less than the amounts allowable under that section for the taxable year and prior years.

(h) For amounts allowed as deductions under Sections 24356.2, 24356.3, and
 24356.4.

(i) (1) To the extent provided in Section 179A(e)(6)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to basis reduction for clean-fuel vehicles and certain refueling property.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to property placed in service after June 30, 1993, without regard to taxable year.

(j) In the case of property the acquisition of which resulted under Section 1044 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to rollover of publicly traded securities gain into specialized small business investment companies, in the nonrecognition of any part of the gain realized on the sale of other property, to the extent provided in Section 1044(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to basis adjustments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 200.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24916.2.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 24916 no adjustment shall be made for (a) abandonment fees paid in respect of property on which the open-space easement is terminated under Section 51061 or 51093 of the Government Code or (b) tax recoupment fees paid under Section 51142 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 853.)
-------------------------------------------

24917.

Whenever it appears that the basis of property in the hands of the corporation is a substituted basis, then the adjustments provided in Section 24916 shall be made after first making in respect of that substituted basis proper adjustments of a similar nature in respect of the period during which the property was held by the transferor, donor, or grantor, or during which the other property was held by the person for whom the basis is to be determined. A similar rule shall be applied in the case of a series of substituted bases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 102.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24918.

(a) Section 1017 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to discharge of indebtedness, shall apply, except as otherwise provided. References to affiliated groups which file a consolidated return under Section 1501 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated as meaning members of the same unitary group which file a combined report under Article 1 (commencing with Section 25101) of Chapter 17.

(b) The amendments to Section 1017 of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section
 13150 of the Revenue and Reconciliation Act of 1993 (Public Law 103-66), relating to modifications of discharge of indebtedness provisions, shall apply to discharges occurring on or after January 1, 1996, in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 201.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24919.

Neither the basis nor the adjusted basis of any portion of real property shall, in the case of the lessor of such property, be increased or diminished on account of income derived by the lessor in respect of such property and excludable from gross income under Section 24309 (relating to improvements by lessee on lessor’s property). If an amount representing any part of the value of real property attributable to buildings erected or other improvements made by a lessee in respect of such property was included in gross income of the lessor for any taxable year beginning before January 1, 1942, the basis of each portion of such property shall be properly adjusted for the
 amount so included in gross income.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Nontaxable Exchanges [24941. - 24955.]

24941.

Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exchange of property held for productive use or investment, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 81.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24941.5.

(a) The amendments made by Section 13303(a) and (b) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to Exchange of real property held for productive use or investment, shall apply, subject to subdivision (b).

(b) (1) This section shall apply to exchanges completed after
 January 10, 2019.

(2) This section shall not apply to an exchange where the property to be disposed of by the taxpayer in the exchange is disposed of by that taxpayer on or before January 10, 2019, or where the property to be received by the taxpayer in the exchange is received by that taxpayer on or before January 10, 2019.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 35.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24942.

(a) No gain or loss shall be recognized to a corporation on the receipt of money or other property in exchange for stock (including treasury stock) of that corporation. No gain or loss shall be recognized by a corporation with respect to any lapse or acquisition of an option, or with respect to a securities futures contract (as defined in Section 1234B of the Internal Revenue Code, to buy or sell its stock (including treasury stock).

(b) For basis of property acquired by a
 corporation in certain exchanges for its stock, see Sections 24552 to 24554, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 58.   Effective May 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24943.

If property (as a result of its destruction in whole or in part, theft, seizure, or requisition or condemnation or threat or imminence thereof) is compulsorily or involuntarily converted—

(a) Into property similar or related in service or use to the property so converted, no gain shall be recognized.

(b) Into money, and the disposition of the converted property occurred before January 1, 1953, no gain shall be recognized if such
 money is forthwith in good faith, under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, expended in the acquisition of other property similar or related in service or use to the property so converted, or in the acquisition of control of a corporation owning such other property, or in the establishment of a replacement fund. If any part of the money is not so expended, the gain shall be recognized to the extent of the money which is not so expended (regardless of whether such money is received in one or more taxable years and regardless of whether or not the money which is not so expended constitutes gain). For purposes of this subsection and Section 24944, the term “disposition of the converted property” means the destruction, theft, seizure, requisition, or condemnation of the converted property, or the sale or exchange of such property under threat or imminence of requisition or condemnation.

For purposes of this section and Section 24944, the term “control”
 means the ownership of stock possessing at least 80 percent of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote and at least 80 percent of the total number of shares of all other classes of stock of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 202.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24944.

If property (as a result of its destruction in whole or in part, theft, seizure, or requisition or condemnation or threat or imminence thereof) is compulsorily or involuntarily converted into money or into property not similar or related in service or use to the converted property, and the disposition of the converted property (as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 24943) occurred after December 31, 1952, the gain (if any) shall be recognized except to the extent hereinafter provided in this section:

(a) If the taxpayer during the period specified in subdivision (b), for the purpose of replacing the property so converted, purchases other property similar or related in service or use to the property so converted, or purchases stock in the acquisition of control of a corporation owning such other property, at the election of the taxpayer the gain shall be recognized only to the extent that the amount realized upon such conversion (regardless of whether such amount is received in one or more taxable years) exceeds the cost of such other property or such stock. Such election shall be made at such time and in such manner as the Franchise Tax Board may by regulations prescribe. For purposes of this subdivision—

(1) No property or stock acquired before the disposition of the converted property shall be considered to have been acquired for the purpose of replacing such converted property unless held by the taxpayer on the date of such
 disposition; and

(2) The taxpayer shall be considered to have purchased property or stock only if, but for the provisions of Section 24947, the unadjusted basis of such property or stock would be its cost within the meaning of Section 24912.

(b) The period referred to in subdivision (a) shall be the period beginning with the date of the disposition of the converted property, or the earliest date of the threat or imminence of requisition or condemnation of the converted property, whichever is the earlier, and ending—

(1) Two years after the close of the first taxable year in which any part of the gain upon the conversion is realized; or

(2) Subject to such terms and conditions as may be specified by the Franchise Tax Board, at the close of such later
 date as the Franchise Tax Board may designate on application by the taxpayer. Such application shall be made at such time and in such manner as the Franchise Tax Board may by regulations prescribe.

(c) For purposes of this section and Section 24943, replacement property “similar or related in service or use” shall include, in the case of a nonprofit water utility corporation, personal property used for the transmission or storage of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 203.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24945.

If a taxpayer has made the election provided in Section 24944(a), then—

(a) The statutory period for the assessment of any deficiency, for any taxable year in which any part of the gain on such conversion is realized, attributable to such gain shall not expire prior to the expiration of four years from the date the Franchise Tax Board is notified by the taxpayer (in such manner as the Franchise Tax Board may by regulations prescribe) of the replacement of the converted property or of an
 intention not to replace; and

(b) Such deficiency may be assessed before the expiration of such four-year period notwithstanding the provisions of any other law or rule of law which would otherwise prevent such assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 204.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24946.

If the election provided in Section 24944(a) is made by the taxpayer and such other property or such stock was purchased before the beginning of the last taxable year in which any part of the gain upon such conversion is realized, any deficiency, to the extent resulting from such election, for any taxable year ending before such last taxable year may be assessed (notwithstanding the provisions of Section 19057 or the provisions of any other law or rule of law which would otherwise prevent such assessment) at any time before the expiration of the period
 within which a deficiency for such last taxable year may be assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 205.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24947.

(a) Section 1033(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to basis of property acquired through involuntary conversion, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.
